New Jersey, session 222, S95.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 21 of P.L.1993, c.29 (C.2A:156A-27) is amended to read as follows: 21.  Unlawful access to stored communications. a.     A person is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree if he (1) knowingly accesses without authorization a facility through which an electronic communication service is provided or exceeds an authorization to access that facility, and (2) thereby obtains, alters, or prevents authorized access to a wire or electronic communication while that communication is in electronic storage.  For purposes of this subsection, a person knowingly accesses without authorization or exceeds an authorization to access if he obtains, alters, or prevents authorized access to a communication that is protected by a password or other personal code, without first knowing and inputting that password or other personal code, or otherwise having the express consent of at least one of the parties to whom that password or other personal code belongs. b.    A person is guilty of a crime of the third degree if, for the purpose of commercial advantage, private commercial gain, or malicious destruction or damage, he (1) knowingly accesses without authorization a facility through which an electronic communication service is provided or exceeds an authorization to access that facility, and (2) thereby obtains, alters, or prevents authorized access to a wire or electronic communication while that communication is in electronic storage.  For purposes of this subsection, a person knowingly accesses without authorization or exceeds an authorization to access if he obtains, alters, or prevents authorized access to a communication that is protected by a password or other personal code, without first knowing and inputting that password or other personal code, or otherwise having the express consent of at least one of the parties to whom that password or other personal code belongs. c.     This section does not apply to conduct authorized:  (1) by the person or entity providing a wire or electronic communication service; or (2) by a user of that service with respect to a communication of or intended for that user; or (3) by section 10 of P.L.1968, c.409 (C.2A:156A-10), section 13 of P.L.1968, c.409 (C.2A:156A-13), or by section 23 or 24 of P.L.1993, c.29 (C.2A:156A-29 or C.2A:156A-30). (cf: P.L.1993, c.29, s.21) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, and apply to any act of unlawful access occurring on or after the effective date.